es: Función del tubo amplificador: Inversor de fase; Potencia/salida; Preamplificador; Rectificador; Excitador/recuperador de reverberación; Otro
sv: Förstärkarrörets funktion: Fasinverterare; Ström/effekt; Förförstärkare; Likriktare; Reverb-driver/recovery; Annan
en: Amplifier tube function: Phase inverter; Power/output; Preamp; Rectifier; Reverb driver/recovery; Other
pt-PT: Função da válvula do amplificador: Inversor de fase; Potência/saída; Pré-amplificador; Retificador; Acionamento/recuperação de reverb; Outro
zh-TW: 擴大機真空管功能: 相位倒相; 功率/輸出; 前級擴大機; 整流器; 殘響驅動/恢復; 其他
ja: アンプチューブFunctions: フェイズインバーター; パワー/出力; プリアンプ; 整流器; リバーブドライバー/リカバリー; その他
ro-RO: Funcția tubului amplificator: Inversor de fază; Putere/ieșire; Preamplificator; Redresor; Driver reverb/recuperare; Altele
it: Functions del tubo amplificatore: Invertitore di fase; Potenza/uscita; Preamplificatore; Raddrizzatore; Driver di riverbero/recupero; Altro
pl: Funkcja lampy wzmacniacza: Odwracacz fazy; Moc/wyjście; Przedwzmacniacz; Prostownik; Driver/odbiornik pogłosu; Inna
nb: Forsterkerrørets funksjon: Faseomformer; Effekt/utgang; Forforsterker; Likeretter; Klangdriver/gjenoppretting; Annet
ru: Функция лампы усилителя: Фазоинвертор; Усилитель мощности/выход; Предусилитель; Выпрямитель; Драйвер ревербератора/восстановление; Другое
hr-HR: Funkcija cijevi pojačala: Invertor faza; Napajanje/izlaz; Pretpojačalo; Ispravljač; Pokretač reverba / oporavak; Ostalo
th: ฟังก์ชันของหลอดแอมพลิฟายเออร์: อินเวอร์เตอร์เฟส; กำลัง/เอาต์พุต; พรีแอมป์; วงจรเรียงกระแส; ไดรเวอร์รีเวิร์บ/รีคัฟเวอรี; อื่นๆ
el: Λειτουργία λυχνίας ενισχυτή: Αναστροφέας φάσης; Ισχύς/έξοδος; Προενισχυτής; Ανορθωτής; Οδηγός/ανάκτηση βάθους (reverb); Άλλο
bg-BG: Функция на лампата в усилвателя: Фазов инвертор; Мощност/изход; Предусилвател; Токоизправител; Драйвер/възстановяване на реверб; Друго
tr: Amplifikatör lambasının işlevi: Faz çevirici; Güç/çıkış; Preamfi; Doğrultucu; Yankı sürücüsü/kurtarma; Diğer
fi: Vahvistinputken toiminta: Vaiheenkääntäjä; Teho/ulostulo; Esivahvistin; Tasasuuntaaja; Kaiun ohjain/palautus; Muu
lt-LT: Stiprintuvo lempos funkcija: Fazių keitiklis; Galia / išvestis; Pradinis stiprintuvas; Lygintuvas; Reverberatoriaus valdiklis / atkūrimas; Kita
de: Funktion der Verstärkerröhre: Phasenumkehrer; Leistung/Ausgang; Vorverstärker; Gleichrichter; Reverb Driver/Recovery; Sonstige
nl: Functie versterkerbuis: Fase-inverter; Vermogen/output; Voorversterker; Gelijkrichter; Reverb-driver/recovery; Overig
vi: Chức năng của bóng khuếch đại: Đảo pha; Công suất/đầu ra; Tiền khuếch đại; Chỉnh lưu; Điều khiển/khôi phục hồi âm; Khác
ko: 앰프 튜브 기능: 위상 반전기; 전원/출력; 프리앰프; 정류기; 리버브 드라이버/복구; 기타
pt-BR: Funções da válvula de amplificador: Inversor de fase; Potência/saída; Pré-amplificador; Retificador; Driver/recuperação de reverb; Outro
da: Forstærkerrørets funktion: Fasevender; Effekt/udgang; Forforstærker; Ensretter; Reverb-driver/-recovery; Andet
cs: Funkce zesilovací elektronky: Fázový invertor; Výkon/výstup; Předzesilovač; Usměrňovač; Budič reverbu / obnova; Jiné
sk-SK: Funkcia elektrónky zosilňovača: Fázový invertor; Napájacie/výstupné; Predzosilňovacie; Usmerňovacie; Budič reverbu/obnova; Iná
fr: Fonction du tube d’amplificateur: Inverseur de phase; Puissance/sortie; Préampli; Redresseur; Driver/récupération de réverbération; Autre
sl-SI: Funkcija ojačevalne cevi: Fazni pretvornik; Moč/izhod; Predojačevalnik; Usmernik; Krmiljenje/povratni odmev; Drugo
hu: Erősítőcső funkciója: Fázisváltó; Erősítő/kimeneti; Előfok; Egyenirányító; Reverb gerjesztő/visszacsatoló; Egyéb
zh-CN: 扩音器电子管功能: 倒相器; 功率/输出; 前置放大器; 整流器; 混响驱动器/恢复器; 其他